District of Columbia statutes.
21-1721

Repealed

Investment of trust assets.

Repealed.

June 16, 1989, D.C. Law 8-9, § 2(d), 36 DCR 3361
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-187, 39 DCR 8228
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(p), 45 DCR 745
Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 3(a)(2), 51 DCR 208
1981 Ed., § 21-1721.